Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-101.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-101 to 43-115:

(1) Acknowledged father means an individual who has:

(a) Executed a valid acknowledgment of paternity; or

(b) Acknowledged paternity through establishment of a familial relationship with the child for a period of at least six months;

(2) Adjudicated father means an individual who has been determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in this state or in another state or territory of the United States, to be the biological or legal father of a minor child;

(3) Juvenile court means the separate juvenile court where it has been established pursuant to sections 43-2,111 to 43-2,127 and the county court sitting as a juvenile court in all other counties; and

(4) Sole legal parent means a legal parent of a child with respect to whom no other person has parental rights.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 2.
July 18, 2026